Massachusetts, session 194th, S2763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following subsection in Section 16G:-
(o.) The executive office of economic development shall, in consultation with the Rural
Policy Advisory Commission, establish and administer a rural development initiative through a
contract with the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency established by section 2 of
chapter 23G. The initiative shall: (1) provide technical assistance to identify and implement
strategies that will spur direct investment in rural communities to create jobs and expand
businesses; (2) identify cross-sector partnerships; (3) accelerate the engagement of community
members in actionable planning; and (4) implement local economic development initiatives.
of 1